Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-356
Policies; violations; penalty.

(1) A violator of any of the provisions of section 44-353 shall be fined not more than one hundred dollars.

(2) A violation of any of the provisions of section 44-354 or 44-355 shall be an unfair trade practice in the business of insurance subject to the Unfair Insurance Trade Practices Act.

Laws 1913, c. 154, § 71, p. 424;

R.S.1913, § 3207;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. IV, § 41, p. 603;

C.S.1922, § 7806;

C.S.1929, § 44-341;

R.S.1943, § 44-356;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 103;

Laws 2008, LB855, § 4.

Unfair Insurance Trade Practices Act, see section 44-1521.